Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7237.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 22 of the General Laws entitled "GENERAL ASSEMBLY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 7.11
PERMANENT JOINT COMMITTEE ON THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH
AND FAMILIES OVERSIGHT
22-7.11-1. Permanent committee -- Composition.
There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on the oversight of
the department of children, youth and families, to consist of eleven (11) members of the general
assembly, six (6) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker,
not more than four (4) of whom shall be from the same political party; five (5) of whom shall be
from the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate, not more than three (3) of whom
shall be from the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original
appointments. The members of the joint committee on the oversight of the department of children,
youth and families shall serve so long as they shall remain members of the house from which they
were appointed and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.
22-7.11-2. Selection of officers.
Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their members shall be
chosen as chairperson, another of their members shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and another of

their members shall be chosen as secretary.
22-7.11-3. Duties.
It shall be the duty of this joint committee to oversee the department of children, youth and
families, and to consult and counsel with all federal and state agencies dealing with the department
of children, youth and families.
22-7.11-4. Reports and recommendations.
The joint committee on the department of children, youth and families oversight shall from
time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of
its studies and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or
initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.
22-7.11-5. Technical assistance.
The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain the proper assistance from available
sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.
22-7.11-6. References to committee.
Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee, either initially or after
action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting the department of
children, youth and families.
22-7.11-7. Place of meeting — Quorum.
The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house
for the use of the joint committee on the department of children, youth and families oversight;
provided, however, that the joint committee on the department of children, youth and families
oversight may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its
purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on the department of children, youth and
families shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003732
========
LC003732 - Page 2 of 3